Maryland, session 2026, SB0360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–606.
(a) (1) In this section, “sexual contact with an animal” means any act:
(i) involving:
1. a person touching the sex organ or anus of an animal;
2. contact between:
A. the sex organ or anus of a person and the mouth, sex
organ, or anus of an animal; or
B. the sex organ or anus of an animal, and the mouth, sex
organ, or anus of a person; or
– 1 –

Ch. 401 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. insertion of:
A. any part of the body of a person into the opening of the
vagina or anus of an animal;
B. any part of an animal’s body into the opening of the vagina
or anus of a person; or
C. any object into the opening of the vagina or anus of an
animal; and
(ii) committed for the purpose of sexual arousal, sexual gratification,
abuse, or financial gain.
(2) “Sexual contact with an animal” does not include:
(i) an accepted veterinary practice;
(ii) artificial insemination of an animal for reproductive purposes;
(iii) accepted animal husbandry practices, including:
1. grooming;
2. raising;
3. breeding;
4. assisting with the birthing process; or
5. any other activity that provides care for an animal; or
(iv) generally accepted practices relating to the judging of breed
confirmation.
(b) A person may not:
(1) intentionally:
(i) mutilate an animal;
(ii) torture an animal;
(iii) cruelly beat an animal;
(iv) cruelly kill an animal; or
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 401
(v) engage in sexual contact with an animal; OR
(2) cause, procure, or authorize an act prohibited under item (1) of this
subsection[; or
(3) except in the case of self–defense, intentionally inflict bodily harm,
permanent disability, or death on an animal owned or used by a law enforcement unit].
(c) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of the felony of aggravated
cruelty to animals and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a
fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(2) As a condition of sentencing, the court may:
(i) order a defendant convicted of violating this section to:
1. participate in and pay for psychological counseling; and
2. pay, in addition to any other fines and costs, all reasonable
costs incurred in removing, housing, treating, or euthanizing an animal confiscated from
the defendant; and
(ii) prohibit a defendant from owning, possessing, or residing with
an animal for a specified period of time.
10–606.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EMERGENCY RESPONSE ANIMAL” MEANS:
(I) A DOG USED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT IN THE STATE
THAT IS TRAINED FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT WORK AND IS SUBJECT TO THE CONTROL
OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO HAS COMPLETED HANDLER TRAINING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE POLICIES OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT THAT EMPLOYS
THE OFFICER;
(II) A HORSE USED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT IN THE STATE
FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT WORK; OR
(III) A SEARCH AND RESCUE DOG TRAINED FOR OR ENGAGED IN
AN EFFORT DIRECTED BY A STATE AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE
STATE TO LOCATE OR RESCUE A LOST, INJURED, OR DECEASED INDIVIDUAL; OR
– 3 –

Ch. 401 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) A HORSE USED IN A SEARCH AND RESCUE EFFORT DIRECTED
BY A STATE AGENCY OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE TO LOCATE OR
RESCUE A LOST, INJURED, OR DECEASED INDIVIDUAL.
(3) “LAW ENFORCEMENT UNIT” HAS THE SAME MEANING STATED IN §
10–101 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(3) (4) “SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY” MEANS PHYSICAL INJURY
THAT CAUSES PERMANENT OR PROTRACTED:
(I) DISFIGUREMENT;
(II) LOSS OF THE FUNCTION OF ANY BODILY MEMBER OR
ORGAN; OR
(III) IMPAIRMENT OF THE FUNCTION OF ANY BODILY MEMBER
OR ORGAN.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY HARASS OR INTERFERE WITH
AN EMERGENCY RESPONSE ANIMAL DURING THE LAWFUL PERFORMANCE OF THE
EMERGENCY RESPONSE ANIMAL’S DUTIES.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY INJURE AN EMERGENCY
RESPONSE ANIMAL.
(3) A PERSON MAY NOT VIOLATE PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION DURING THE COMMISSION OF A CRIME.
(4) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY KILL OR CAUSE SERIOUS
PHYSICAL INJURY TO AN EMERGENCY RESPONSE ANIMAL.
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(1) OR (2) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR
BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(3) OR (B)(4) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 2 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $15,000
$10,000 OR BOTH.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 401
(3) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B)(4) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR BOTH.
(D) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE IMPOSED
SEPARATE FROM AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR
ANY CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (D) (1) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A DEFENDANT FROM
ASSERTING THE DEFENSE OF NECESSITY OR SELF–DEFENSE TO A CHARGE OF
VIOLATING THIS SECTION.
(2) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO A CHARGE OF VIOLATING THIS
SECTION THAT THE DEFENDANT ACTED REASONABLY TO PREVENT PHYSICAL HARM
RESULTING FROM A VIOLATION OF THE MARYLAND USE OF FORCE STATUTE UNDER
§ 3–572 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –